apertium-kmr.kmr.dix
    <pardef n="şem/b__n">
      <e><p><l>b</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l/><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bê</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ba</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bê</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ek</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bekê</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>beke</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
         <e r="LR"><p><l/><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>b</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bên</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ban</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bên</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>in</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>binan</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bine</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bê</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ban</l><r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="jin__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ekê</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eke</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ên</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ên</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inan</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="nîvro__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yê</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ya</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yê</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yekê</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeke</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yên</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yan</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yên</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yin</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yinan</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yine</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yê</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yan</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="r/ê__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r>ê<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>êya</l><r>ê<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iya</l><r>ê<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>


    <pardef n="YNK__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="DYA__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yê</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Proper nouns -->
    <pardef n="Tîrêj__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ekê</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eke</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

    <pardef n="Şeib/î__np">
      <e><p><l>î</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyê</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iya</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyê</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyek</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyekê</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyeke</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

    <e lm="TKP"><i>TKP</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="AKP"><i>AKP</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="IBM"><i>IBM</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="RNA"><i>RNA</i><par n="DYA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="UEFA"><i>UEFA</i><par n="DYA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="PZ"><i>PZ</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cild"><i>cild</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="RSS"><i>RSS</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="CHP"><i>CHP</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="CIA"><i>CIA</i><par n="DYA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="WWE"><i>WWE</i><par n="DYA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="FIFA"><i>FIFA</i><par n="DYA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="PJAK"><i>PJAK</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="KBS"><i>KBS</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="YE"><i>YE</i><par n="DYA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="UNESCO"><i>UNESCO</i><par n="DYA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ISO"><i>ISO</i><par n="DYA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="LGBT"><i>LGBT</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="GNU"><i>GNU</i><par n="DYA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="HEP"><i>HEP</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="NATO"><i>NATO</i><par n="DYA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="HPG"><i>HPG</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="TL"><i>TL</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ISBN"><i>ISBN</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="UTC"><i>UTC</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="BR"><i>BR</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="CD"><i>CD</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="DNA"><i>DNA</i><par n="DYA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="DTP"><i>DTP</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="DYE"><i>DYE</i><par n="DYA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="DYA"><i>DYA</i><par n="DYA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="PDK"><i>PDK</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="şemb"><i>şem</i><par n="şem/b__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yekşemb"><i>yekşem</i><par n="şem/b__n"/></e>
    <e lm="duşemb"><i>duşem</i><par n="şem/b__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sêşemb"><i>sêşem</i><par n="şem/b__n"/></e>
    <e lm="çarşemb"><i>çarşem</i><par n="şem/b__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pêncşemb"><i>pêncşem</i><par n="şem/b__n"/></e>
      <e lm="agirbest"><i>agirbest</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="asro"><i>asro</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="banz"><i>banz</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="bela"><i>bela</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="bizdîn"><i>bizdîn</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="ciganka"><i>ciganka</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="dakirin"><i>dakirin</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="derya"><i>derya</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="dorandin"><i>dorandin</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="duşemb"><i>duşem</i><par n="şem/b__n"/></e>
      <e lm="efû"><i>efû</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="eynat"><i>eynat</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="fauna"><i>fauna</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="genetîka"><i>genetîka</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="gijok"><i>gijok</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="haîku"><i>haîku</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="hereket"><i>hereket</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="iqtidar"><i>iqtidar</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="irtişa"><i>irtişa</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="kamera"><i>kamera</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="keynek"><i>keynek</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="kompanya"><i>kompanya</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="kêşmekêş"><i>kêşmekêş</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="loto"><i>loto</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="mekanîzma"><i>mekanîzma</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="mencel"><i>mencel</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="mêtro"><i>mêtro</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="mîzanpaj"><i>mîzanpaj</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="pano"><i>pano</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="paragraf"><i>paragraf</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="piştî nîvro"><i>piştî nîvro</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="prototîp"><i>prototîp</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="puro"><i>puro</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="qisûr"><i>qisûr</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="ra"><i>ra</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="rişwet"><i>rişwet</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="serma"><i>serma</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="tebab"><i>tebab</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="teva"><i>teva</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="weşandin"><i>weşandin</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="xweza"><i>xweza</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="çolistan"><i>çolistan</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="îro"><i>îro</i><par n="nîvro__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rê"><i>r</i><par n="r/ê__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="DAIŞ"><p><l>DAÎŞ</l><r>DAIŞ</r></p><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="YNK"><i>YNK</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="PKK"><i>PKK</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ENKS"><i>ENKS</i><par n="YNK__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Heşda Şeibî"><i>Heşda<b/>Şeib</i><par n="Şeib/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tîrêj"><i>Tîrêj</i><par n="Tîrêj__np"/></e>
    <e lm="famkirin"><i>famkirin</i><par n="jin__n_f"/></e>
